District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-773

Private facilities — Violations of provisions or regulations.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1908, 35 Stat. 65, ch. 148, § 3
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(i), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 32-103.
1973 Ed., § 32-303.